Colorado statutes. TITLE 40 Utilities
ARTICLE 10
MOTOR VEHICLE CARRIERS

40-10-101 to 40-10-120. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article repealed, (HB 11-1198), ch. 127, p. 416, § 2, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 9 of chapter 115, C.R.S. 1963. For amendments to this article prior to its repeal in 2011, consult the 2010 Colorado Revised Statutes and the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.

Cross references:

For current provisions concerning common carriers, see article 10.1 of this title.